Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Committees
10-3-2602. Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Autism — Creation.

The Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Autism is created.

The task force shall consist of the following members:

One (1) member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

One (1) member of the Senate, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

One (1) member who is an employee of the Division of Medical Services of the Department of Human Services, appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services;

One (1) member who is a board-certified behavior analyst, appointed by the Arkansas Psychology Board;

One (1) member to represent Easter Seals, appointed by Easter Seals Arkansas;

The Director of the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services of the Department of Human Services;

The Behavior Intervention Coordinator of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;

One (1) member to represent Arkansas Blue Cross and Blue Shield;

One (1) member who is a pediatric physician who regularly works with autistic patients, appointed by the Dennis Developmental Center of the Department of Pediatrics of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;

One (1) member who is a clinical geneticist, appointed by the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;

One (1) member to represent Partners for Inclusive Communities of the University Centers of Excellence in Developmental Disabilities Education, Research, and Service of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;

The Behavior Intervention Services Coordinator for the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;

The Associate Director of Special Education of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education;

One (1) public school Special Education Supervisor, appointed by the Arkansas Association of Special Education Administrators;

One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Children's Research Institute, appointed by Arkansas Children's Hospital;

Four (4) members who are parents or guardians of children with autism, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

Four (4) members who are parents or guardians of children with autism, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall call the first of the task force meetings within thirty (30) days of July 31, 2009.

At the first meeting, the members of the task force shall elect from the membership a chair and other officers as needed for the transaction of its business.

The task force shall conduct its meetings in Pulaski County at the State Capitol.

Meetings shall be held at least one (1) time every three (3) months but may occur more often at the call of the chair.

If a vacancy occurs among the legislative members of the task force, the vacancy shall be filled by the same process as the original appointment.

If a vacancy occurs among the nonlegislative members of the task force, the vacancy shall be filled by vote of the task force.

The task force shall establish rules and procedures for conducting its business.

A majority of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum for transacting any business of the task force.

The Bureau of Legislative Research shall provide staff for the task force.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (b)(3); and substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (b)(7), (b)(12), and (b)(13).

Examine how the State of Arkansas responds to autism and autism spectrum disorders;

Determine the best practices to treat autism and autism spectrum disorders;

Recommend more efficient methods for treating autism and autism spectrum disorders;

Recommend how to obtain more federal funds for treating autism and autism spectrum disorders and provide special education to children with autism and autism spectrum disorders; and

Recommend to the General Assembly specific changes to the law that will improve treatment of autism and autism spectrum disorders and improve the provision of special education to children with autism and autism spectrum disorders.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, No. 1500, § 5: Apr. 23, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the federal healthcare laws established by Pub. L. No. 111-148, as amended by Pub. L. No. 111-152, allow each state to establish a health insurance marketplace or opt to participate in a health insurance marketplace operated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services; that the state has elected to create a state-based marketplace effective on July 1, 2015; and that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity to begin the process of planning for the implementation of a state-based marketplace and transitioning to a state-based marketplace. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Legislative Oversight Committee, was repealed by identical Acts 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 4 and 5, §4. The section was derived from Acts 2013, No. 1500, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 49: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that prison overcrowding is one of the largest problems currently burdening the state both from a public safety and budgetary standpoint; that safe and effective measures are needed to immediately combat this problem; and that this act is immediately necessary because in the interests of public safety and the state budget the Department of Correction, Department of Community Correction, Department of Human Services, and the Parole Board should be allowed to immediately implement these new measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Legislative Criminal Justice Oversight Task Force, expired by its own terms September 30, 2017. The section was derived from Acts 2015, No. 895, § 4; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 25; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 25.

The purpose of the task force is to coordinate the implementation of initiatives and strategies designed to promote efficiency and safety in the criminal justice system as well as promote justice reinvestment goals.

The Governor's office shall provide staff support for the task force.

The task force shall be composed of the following seventeen (17) members, as follows:

One (1) member who is a circuit court judge;

One (1) member who is a district court judge;

One (1) member who is a county sheriff;

One (1) member who is a county judge;

One (1) member who is appointed by and who represents the Governor; and

Two (2) members who are prosecuting attorneys;

Two (2) members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

Two (2) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

One (1) member appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services who represents the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services;

The Chair of the Board of Corrections or his or her designee;

The Chair of the Parole Board or his or her designee;

The Director of the Division of Correction or his or her designee;

The Director of the Division of Community Correction or his or her designee; and

The Attorney General or his or her designee.

The annual report shall include recommendations for improvements and a summary of savings generated and the impact on public safety resulting from this act.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (b)(4); substituted “Director of the Division of Correction” for “Director of the Department of Correction” in (b)(7); substituted “Director of the Division of Community Correction” for “Director of the Department of Community Correction” in (b)(8); and, in (d)(2), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”.

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 2017, No. 423, codified as §§5-4-303,5-4-312,6-64-1201 [repealed],6-64-1202 [repealed],10-3-2802,12-6-601,12-9-119,12-11-110 [repealed],12-12-219,12-27-127,12-27-149,12-41-108,16-90-803,16-90-804,16-93-101,16-93-306,16-93-308 —16-93-310,16-93-705,16-93-712,16-93-715,16-93-1202,16-98-303,20-47-101 —20-47-104 [repealed],20-47-105,20-47-106,20-47-107 [repealed],20-47-109,20-47-801 —20-47-813.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 49: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that prison overcrowding is one of the largest problems currently burdening the state both from a public safety and budgetary standpoint; that safe and effective measures are needed to immediately combat this problem; and that this act is immediately necessary because in the interests of public safety and the state budget the Department of Correction, Department of Community Correction, Department of Human Services, and the Parole Board should be allowed to immediately implement these new measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Members of the task force shall receive no pay for their services, but each member may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

This section expires on July 1, 2019.

There is created a Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee.

The committee shall consist of the following members:

A public defender appointed by the Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Defender Commission;

A member of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

The Arkansas Drug Director or the director's designee.

A majority of the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for transacting any business of the committee.

The committee is established to:

Promote collaboration and provide recommendations on issues involving adult and juvenile specialty courts; and

Design and complete the comprehensive evaluation of adult and juvenile specialty court programs as required by § 16-10-139.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 326 substituted “Three (3) district court judges who preside” for “One (1) district court judge who presides” in (b)(4).

The 2017 amendment by No. 913 substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” in (b)(8).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” and “secretary’s designee” for “director’s designee” in (b)(7).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 49: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that prison overcrowding is one of the largest problems currently burdening the state both from a public safety and budgetary standpoint; that safe and effective measures are needed to immediately combat this problem; and that this act is immediately necessary because in the interests of public safety and the state budget the Department of Correction, Department of Community Correction, Department of Human Services, and the Parole Board should be allowed to immediately implement these new measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

No more than one (1) member who is engaged in providing substance abuse treatment in the private sector;

No more than one (1) member who is engaged in providing mental health treatment in the private sector; and

No more than two (2) members of the general public who advocate for access to behavioral health services;

The Director of the Department of Community Correction or his or her designee;

The Deputy Chief Counsel of the Office of Chief Counsel of the Department of Human Services or his or her designee;

The Insurance Commissioner or his or her designee;

One (1) member of the General Assembly to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and

One (1) member of the General Assembly to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 126, provided:

“(a)Except as provided in this section, provisions of this act altering the appointment structure of a task force, commission, committee, or other governmental entity shall not shorten the term of any member of the task force, commission, committee, or other governmental entity but shall be implemented by the filling of vacancies.

“(b)The Governor may remove a member of the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission who was appointed to the commission before the effective date [May 23, 2016] of Section 85 of this act.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 127, provided: “Sections of the Arkansas Code amended by this act that expire on or before September 30, 2017, may be removed from the Arkansas Code by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission after their respective expiration date.”

Amendments. The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Office of Chief Counsel of” for “General Counsel Section for” in (b)(3); deleted “meet on or before the thirtieth day after April 1, 2015, at the call of the member of the General Assembly appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and” following “shall” in (c)(1); deleted “Thereafter” from the beginning of (c)(2); and added (e).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 1, provided: “This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Arkansas Highway Improvement Plan of 2016’.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 23: July 1, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas bridges and roads are in need of repair and proper maintenance; that the repair and proper maintenance of Arkansas bridges and roads are necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety; that increased funding is essential to the repair and proper maintenance of Arkansas bridges and roads; that this act is designed to provide the necessary funding that is essential to the repair and proper maintenance of Arkansas bridges and roads, and this act is necessary because without this increased funding, the repair and proper maintenance of Arkansas bridges and roads may not be performed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1-8, 13, 15, 18-21 of this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2016.”

Subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section is limited to rule review only.

Rules promulgated by the State Highway Commission are not subject to approval by the Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, the Legislative Council, or the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council under this section or § 10-3-309; and

The Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall perform such other duties as may be assigned to it by the Legislative Council.

As a subcommittee of the Legislative Council, actions of the Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall be reported to the Legislative Council for final consideration and adoption.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Administrative Rules Subcommittee” for “Administrative Rules and Regulations Subcommittee” in (a)(1)(B)(ii).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1272, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2219-2221.

10-3-2603. Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Autism — Duties.

The Arkansas Legislative Task Force on Autism shall:

On or before August 31 of each year, the task force shall provide the General Assembly with a written explanation of the recommended legislative changes.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1272, § 1.

Subchapter 27

— Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Legislative Oversight Committee

10-3-2701. [Repealed.]

10-3-2801. [Expired.]

(1)(A)There is created the Interagency Task Force for the Implementation of Criminal Justice Prevention Initiatives.

Seven (7) members shall be appointed by the Governor:

(1)The task force shall meet on or before the thirtieth day after September 1, 2017, at the call of the member appointed by and who represents the Governor, and organize itself by electing one (1) of its members as Chair of the Interagency Task Force for the Implementation of Criminal Justice Prevention Initiatives and other officers as the task force may consider necessary.

Thereafter, the task force shall meet at least quarterly and at the call of the chair or by a majority of the members.

A quorum of the task force consists of nine (9) members.

The task force has the following powers and duties:

To track the implementation of and evaluate compliance with this act;

To review performance and outcome measure reports submitted semiannually by the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Parole Board, the Board of Corrections, the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, and the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee under this act and evaluate the impact;

To develop quality assurance reporting on the implementation of policies and the expenditure of resource investments related to the justice reinvestment policies and reinvestments; and

(A)To prepare and submit an annual report of the performance and outcome measures that are part of this act to the Legislative Council, the Governor, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 423, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5151-5153.

Subchapter 29

— Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee

10-3-2901. Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court or the Chief Justice's designee who shall serve as Chair of the Specialty Court Program Advisory Committee;

The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts or the director's designee;

Three (3) circuit court judges who preside over a specialty court program as defined under §16-10-139(a) to be appointed by the Arkansas Judicial Council, Inc.;

Three (3) district court judges who preside over a specialty court program as defined under §16-10-139(a) to be appointed by the Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc.;

One (1) circuit court judge who presides over a juvenile drug court program to be appointed by the Arkansas Judicial Council, Inc.;

The Director of the Department of Community Correction or the director's designee;

The Secretary of the Department of Human Services or the secretary's designee;

The Director of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services or the director's designee;

A prosecutor appointed by the Prosecutor Coordinator;

The chair or the chair's designee shall promptly call the first meeting within thirty (30) days after April 1, 2015.

(1)The committee shall conduct its meetings at the State Capitol Building or at any place designated by the chair or the chair's designee.

Meetings shall be held at least one (1) time every three (3) months but may occur more often at the call of the chair.

If any vacancy occurs on the committee, the vacancy shall be filled by the same process as the original appointment.

The committee shall establish rules and procedures for conducting its business.

Members of the committee shall serve without compensation.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 5; 2017, No. 326, § 1; 2017, No. 913, § 36; 2019, No. 910, § 5154.

Subchapter 30

— Behavioral Health Treatment Access Legislative Task Force

10-3-3001. Behavioral Health Treatment Access Legislative Task Force. [Expired.]

(1)There is created a Behavioral Health Treatment Access Legislative Task Force responsible for ensuring that persons in the criminal justice system who have a demonstrated need for behavioral health treatment have access to treatment.

The Bureau of Legislative Research shall provide staff support for the task force.

The task force is composed of no more than nine (9) members, as follows:

No more than four (4) members may be appointed by the Governor from the following persons:

(1)The task force shall organize itself by electing such other officers as the task force may consider necessary.

The task force is to meet at least quarterly and as often as necessary and at the call of the Chair of the Behavioral Health Treatment Access Legislative Task Force or a majority of the members.

A quorum of the task force consists of five (5) members.

The task force has the following powers and duties:

To facilitate access to behavioral health treatment programs;

To coordinate with other public and private entities to develop and promote access;

To take steps to reduce costs and encourage evidence-based care;

To assess feasibility and make recommendation for changes to state programs to improve access; and

To prepare and submit an annual report by December 1 of each year to the Governor and the Legislative Council.

This section shall expire on September 30, 2017.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 6; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 26; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 26.

Subchapter 31

— Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council

10-3-3101. Creation.

The Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council is created.

(1)The Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall consist of twenty (20) members with at least four (4) or more members of the General Assembly from each congressional district of the state.

The Legislative Council, through a suspension of its rules, may alter the membership of the Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, §
3.

10-3-3102. Duties.

The Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council shall review:

(A)Proposed rules of the State Highway Commission required under §27-65-107(a)(18)(A).

Other State Highway Commission matters the Highway Commission Review and Advisory Subcommittee of the Legislative Council considers necessary to perform its duties under this section.

History.

Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 1, §
3; 2019, No. 315, § 749.

Subchapter 32

— Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee

10-3-3201. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly intends to establish the Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee as a mechanism to promote transparency and efficiency concerning procedures of child maltreatment investigations in this state.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 713, § 1.